Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1222.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3(b) of the act of January 14, 1952 (1951 P.L.1898, No.522), known as the Funeral Director Law, is amended to read:Section 3. Application for License; Qualifications of Applicants.--* * *(b) Each applicant shall be [a citizen of the United States,] at least twenty-one (21) years of age[,] and a graduate of an approved high school of this Commonwealth or have an education equivalent thereto under the rules and regulations of the board.12345678910111213141516171819202122 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1222PN1438 - 2 - 12